Illinois, session 104th, SB1986.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-110.14 and 7-139.1a as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-110.14)7    Sec. 3-110.14. Transfer to Article 7. 8    (a) On and after July 1, 2022 but no later than December 1, 92023, a participating employee who is actively employed as a 10sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7 may make a 11written election to transfer up to 10 years of creditable 12service from a fund established under this Article to the 13Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund established under Article 147. Upon receiving a written election by a participant under 15this Section, the creditable service shall be transferred to 16the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund as soon as practicable 17upon payment by the police pension fund to the Illinois 18Municipal Retirement Fund of an amount equal to:19        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 20    applicant on the books of the fund on the date of the 21    transfer; and 22        (2) employer contributions in an amount equal to the 23    amount determined under paragraph (1).   SB1986- 2 -LRB104 08481 RPS 18533 b1Participation in the police pension fund with respect to the 2service to be transferred shall terminate on the date of 3transfer. This Section does not allow reinstatement of credits 4in this Article that were previously forfeited. 5    (b) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 6of the 104th General Assembly but no later than 6 months after 7the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 8Assembly, a participating employee who is actively employed as 9a sheriff's law enforcement employee under Article 7 may make 10a written election to transfer creditable service from a fund 11established under this Article to the Illinois Municipal 12Retirement Fund established under Article 7. Upon receiving a 13written election by a participant under this Section, the 14creditable service shall be transferred to the Illinois 15Municipal Retirement Fund as soon as practicable upon payment 16by the police pension fund to the Illinois Municipal 17Retirement Fund of an amount equal to:18        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 19    applicant on the books of the fund on the date of the 20    transfer; and21        (2) employer contributions in an amount equal to the 22    amount determined under paragraph (1).23    Participation in the police pension fund with respect to 24the service to be transferred shall terminate on the date of 25transfer. This Section does not allow reinstatement of credits 26in this Article that were previously forfeited.   SB1986- 3 -LRB104 08481 RPS 18533 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1061, eff. 6-10-22.) 2    (40 ILCS 5/7-139.1a)3    Sec. 7-139.1a. Transfer from Article 3. 4    (a) On and after July 1, 2022 but no later than January 1, 52023, a participating sheriff's law enforcement employee may 6elect to transfer up to 10 years of service credit to the Fund 7as set forth in Section 3-110.14. To establish creditable 8service under this Section, the sheriff's law enforcement 9employee may elect to do either of the following:10        (1) pay to the Fund an amount to be determined by the 11    Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 12    employee and employer contributions transferred to the 13    Fund under Section 3-110.14 and the amounts that would 14    have been contributed had such contributions been made at 15    the rates applicable to a sheriff's law enforcement 16    employee under this Article, plus (ii) interest thereon at 17    the actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from 18    the date of service to the date of payment; or 19        (2) have the amount of his or her creditable service 20    established under this Section reduced by an amount 21    corresponding to the amount by which (i) the employer and 22    employee contributions that would have been required if he 23    or she had participated in the Fund as a sheriff's law 24    enforcement employee during the period for which credit is 25    being transferred, plus interest thereon at the   SB1986- 4 -LRB104 08481 RPS 18533 b1    actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from the 2    date of termination of the service for which credit is 3    being transferred to the date of payment, exceeds (ii) the 4    amount actually transferred to the Fund.5    Notwithstanding the amount transferred by the Article 3 6fund pursuant to Section 3-110.14, in no event shall the 7service credit established under this Section exceed the 8lesser of 10 years or the actual amount of service credit that 9had been earned in the Article 3 fund. If an amount greater 10than the amount described under paragraph (1) is transferred 11to the Fund, the additional amount shall be credited to the 12account of the sheriff's law enforcement employee's employer. 13    (b) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 14of the 104th General Assembly but no later than 6 months after 15the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16Assembly, a participating sheriff's law enforcement employee 17may elect to transfer service credit to the Fund as set forth 18in Section 3-110.14. To establish creditable service under 19this Section, the sheriff's law enforcement employee may elect 20to do either of the following:21        (1) pay to the Fund an amount to be determined by the 22    Board, equal to (i) the difference between the amount of 23    employee and employer contributions transferred to the 24    Fund under Section 3-110.14 and the amounts that would 25    have been contributed had such contributions been made at 26    the rates applicable to a sheriff's law enforcement   SB1986- 5 -LRB104 08481 RPS 18533 b1    employee under this Article, plus (ii) interest thereon at 2    the actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from 3    the date of service to the date of payment; or4        (2) have the amount of his or her creditable service 5    established under this Section reduced by an amount 6    corresponding to the amount by which (i) the employer and 7    employee contributions that would have been required if he 8    or she had participated in the Fund as a sheriff's law 9    enforcement employee during the period for which credit is 10    being transferred, plus interest thereon at the 11    actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from the 12    date of termination of the service for which credit is 13    being transferred to the date of payment, exceeds (ii) the 14    amount actually transferred to the Fund.15    Notwithstanding the amount transferred by the Article 3 16fund pursuant to Section 3-110.14, in no event shall the 17service credit established under this Section exceed the 18actual amount of service credit that had been earned in the 19Article 3 fund. If an amount greater than the amount described 20under paragraph (1) is transferred to the Fund, the additional 21amount shall be credited to the account of the sheriff's law 22enforcement employee's employer. 23(Source: P.A. 102-1061, eff. 6-10-22.) 24    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 25Section 8.49 as follows:   SB1986- 6 -LRB104 08481 RPS 18533 b1    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)2    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 38 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 4the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 5Act of the 104th General Assembly.